Washington statutes.
RCW 36.36.035

Reduced fees for low-income persons.

A county may adopt an ordinance reducing the level of fees, for the withdrawal of subterranean water or for on-site sewage disposal, that are imposed upon the residential property of a class or classes of low-income persons.

[ 1987 c 381 s 1.]